Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.510

Acts prohibited near voting centers, student engagement hubs, and ballot drop boxes.

(1) During the voting period that begins eighteen days before and ends the day of a special election, general election, or primary, no person may:

(a) Within a voting center or student engagement hub or in any public street or room in any public manner within 100 feet measured radially from the entrance to a voting center or student engagement hub or 25 feet measured radially from a ballot drop box as described in RCW 29A.40.170:

(i) Suggest or persuade or attempt to suggest or persuade any voter to vote for or against any candidate or ballot measure;

(ii) Circulate cards or handbills of any kind;

(iii) Solicit signatures to any kind of petition; or

(iv) Engage in any practice which interferes with the freedom of voters to exercise their franchise or disrupts the administration of the voting center;

(b) Engage in any activities restricted under (a) of this subsection through electronic amplification located more than 100 feet from an entrance to a voting center or student engagement hub or 25 feet from an entrance to a ballot drop box if the person is capable of being understood within 100 feet of the voting center or student engagement hub or 25 feet of the ballot drop box;

(c) Obstruct the doors or entries to a building in which a voting center or ballot drop location is located or prevent free access to and from any voting center or ballot drop location.

(2) The auditor shall post a sign at the point or points specified at each voting center as required by RCW 29A.40.160 during the voting period providing notice of the prohibition in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(3) Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or municipal law enforcement officer shall stop the prohibited activity, and may arrest any person engaging in the prohibited activity.

(4) Any violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor, punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021, and the person convicted may be ordered to pay the costs of prosecution.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit or otherwise restrict the access of an authorized political party observer to a voting center, student engagement hub, or ballot drop box for the purpose of observing the election process.

[ 2022 c 69 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 82; 2011 c 10 s 69; 2003 c 111 s 2121. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 20; 1990 c 59 s 75; 1984 c 35 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 33 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.51.020; prior: (i) 1947 c 35 s 1, part; 1889 p 412 s 33, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5298, part. (ii) 1895 c 156 s 7, part; 1889 p 409 s 22, part; Code 1881 s 3079, part; 1865 p 34 s 4, part; RRS s 5279, part. Formerly RCW 29.51.020.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.